Utah statutes.
53B-16-404.   Internship programs -- Criminal background checks.

An institution of higher education shall require an officer or employee of the institution or a cooperating employer, who will be given significant unsupervised access to a minor student in connection with the student's activities as an intern, to submit to a criminal background check on the same basis as volunteer school district workers under Section 53A-3-410.



Enacted by Chapter 73, 1996 General Session

